Wyoming statutes. Title 12 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 3. Powers and Duties

§ 12-2-301.
Generally.

Except as provided in W.S. 12-2-203(g), the division is the exclusive wholesale distributor and seller of alcoholic liquor within Wyoming. It is granted the sole right to sell alcoholic liquors at wholesale, and no licensee or permittee who is granted the right to sell, distribute or receive alcoholic liquors at retail shall purchase any alcoholic liquors from any source other than the division, unless as authorized pursuant to W.S. 12-4-201(j) or as otherwise expressly authorized by state law. Any out-of-state shipment of alcoholic liquor or malt beverage into this state is prohibited unless otherwise expressly authorized by state law.

The department shall make rules and regulations as it considers necessary to carry out this title which shall not be inconsistent with applicable laws and regulations of this state or of the United States.

The director of the department shall direct inspections and other investigations as he considers necessary for the enforcement of the law and the rules and regulations of the department.

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 74, § 3.

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 2.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 117, § 2; 1939, ch. 109, § 1; 1945, ch. 132, §§ 1-5; C.S. 1945, § 53-102; Laws 1953, ch. 102, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 12-39 (a), (e), (g), (h); Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1975, ch. 23, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

12-3-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1981, Sp. Sess, ch 22, § 1; 1985, ch. 92, § 2; 1996, ch. 74, § 3; 2001, ch. 84, § 2; 2008, ch. 44, § 2; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 104, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 72, § 1, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to granting of credit to retailers by commission, see §

12-5-402

.

The 2008 amendment,

repealed former (e), pertaining to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” in (a).

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 72, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, added “as authorized pursuant to W.S. 12-4-201(j) or as” preceding “otherwise expressly authorized” in the second sentence.

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 104, § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a), added “Except as provided in W.S. 12-2-203(g)” at the beginning of the first sentence.

State has power to prohibit, regulate and control

the traffic in and the sale and use of intoxicating liquors within its borders. Harrison v. Wyoming Liquor Comm'n, 63 Wyo. 13, 177 P.2d 397,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1947).

Right to control includes right to restrict consumption. —

The right to prohibit, regulate and control the traffic of intoxicating liquor includes the right to restrict, limit and curb the consumption thereof. Harrison v. Wyoming Liquor Comm'n, 63 Wyo. 13, 177 P.2d 397,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1947).

Warehouse employee entitled to worker's compensation benefits.—

Because the storage of goods at the commission's warehouse is incidental to their sale to a retailer, who is not the ultimate consumer, the commission is engaged in the extrahazardous occupation of “warehousing” within the Worker's Compensation Act (chapter 14 of title 27). Thus, a warehouse employee injured while unloading a shipment of liquor is entitled to compensation benefits. State ex rel. Wyo. Worker's Comp. Div. v. Patch, 798 P.2d 839,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 120

(Wyo. 1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of statute or rule making specified condition or conduct the ground for cancellation or suspension of license, regardless of personal fault of licensee, 3 ALR2d 107.

Forfeiture of property for violation of liquor laws, before trial of individual offender, 3 ALR2d 738.

Immunity from suit of governmental liquor control agency, 9 ALR2d 1292.

State power to regulate price of intoxicating liquors, 14 ALR2d 699.

§ 12-2-302.
Collection of excise taxes; disposition of revenue and fees.

The division shall collect all excise taxes provided by this title relating to alcoholic and malt beverages for deposit into the general fund.

All other revenue and fees collected by the division shall be deposited into the state treasury to the credit of the enterprise fund except as otherwise provided by law. The legislature shall authorize expenditures as necessary to defray the administrative expenses of the division, including salaries, office expenses and general expenses for the enforcement of their duties and sufficient funds to defray the cost of alcoholic liquor purchases and attendant expenses as provided by W.S. 9-4-205(d).

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 117, § 2; 1939, ch. 109, § 1; 1945, ch. 132, §§ 1-5; C.S. 1945, § 53-102; W.S. 1957, § 12-39 (b), (d); Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1975, ch. 23, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

12-3-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to excise taxes generally, see chapter 3 of this title.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “9-4-204(o) and” preceding “9-4-205(d).”

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” throughout the section.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

Excise tax deemed exercise of state's police power. —

The effect of both profit and excise tax is to curb, limit and restrict the consumption of intoxicating liquor by a valid exercise of the state's police power, and these methods do not transform an essentially governmental function into a private enterprise. Harrison v. Wyoming Liquor Comm'n, 63 Wyo. 13, 177 P.2d 397,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1947).

§ 12-2-303.
Purchase and sale of alcoholic liquors; shortages.

The Wyoming liquor division shall purchase and sell alcoholic liquors to qualified licensees within the state including, at the discretion of the division, any retail distributors or permittees operating within any military post or national park located within the boundaries of the state of Wyoming. Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, sales shall be made at prices sufficient to return the cost of merchandise and all expenses of operation together with a profit, not to exceed seventeen and six-tenths percent (17.6%) above the cost of the merchandise.

In the case of a shortage in the supply of any alcoholic liquor, the division may apportion its available supply among the licensees in an equitable manner.

The Wyoming liquor division may sell an alcoholic liquor at a price less than that provided in subsection (a) of this section if the alcoholic liquor has been designated by the division as overstocked or has been removed from the division’s published listing of alcoholic liquors to be kept for sale to licensees. For purposes of this section “overstocked” means the amount of the alcoholic liquor in the division’s inventory is greater than would be sold in a twelve (12) month period.

The holder of a manufacturer’s license under W.S. 12-2-203(a) that sells alcoholic liquor not obtained through the division as provided in W.S. 12-2-203(g) shall, before the transfer of the product to a satellite location, remit to the division an assessment in an amount equal to the profit allowed under subsection (a) of this section and the associated excise tax assessed under W.S.

12-3-101

that would have been received by the division had the holder of a manufacturer’s license first obtained the alcoholic liquor from the division as provided in subsection (a) of this section. The department shall by rule define the procedure under which a holder of a manufacturer’s license shall report and remit the assessment under this subsection.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 117, § 2; 1939, ch. 109, § 1; 1945, ch. 132, §§ 1-5; C.S. 1945, § 53-102; Laws 1953, ch. 102, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 12-39 (a); Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; 1975, ch. 23, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

12-3-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1996, ch. 74, § 2; 1997, ch. 165, § 1; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016; 2019 ch. 104, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2021 ch. 150, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” in (b).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, added (d).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the first sentence of (d), substituted "a" for "the" preceding "satellite location."

Commission not private enterprise. —

The provision of this section providing for the making of profit is not mandatory and such profits are purely incidental to the control of liquor traffic and do not constitute the commission a private enterprise when it buys and sells liquor. Harrison v. Wyoming Liquor Comm'n, 63 Wyo. 13, 177 P.2d 397,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1947).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Liability of state or municipality in tort for damages arising out of sale of intoxicating liquor by state or municipally operated liquor store or establishment, 95 ALR3d 1243.

§ 12-2-304.
Inspections and examinations; failure to permit entry.

The division, through its employees or agents, may enter and inspect at any time every place of business wherein malt or alcoholic beverages are being sold, stored or kept by any licensee or permittee.

The division, through its employees or agents, may examine the records, books of account and stock of malt and alcoholic beverages of retailers, wholesalers and licensees.

If any licensee refuses to permit the entry of an agent of the division to his place of business or storage place for the purpose of inspection, his license may be revoked as provided by law. Entry for purposes of inspection is authorized only during open business hours unless it is in the presence of the licensee or his duly authorized representative or unless the officer making entry does so under court order or has reasonable grounds to believe that evidence of any violation of this title is within the place to be entered.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 117, § 2; 1939, ch. 109, § 1; 1945, ch. 132, §§ 1-5; C.S. 1945, § 53-102; W.S. 1957, § 12-39 (c); W.S. 1977, §

12-3-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” throughout the section.

Meaning of “this title.” —

The phrase “this title” refers to Title 12 since that is the title in which the statute appears. Thus, for purposes of entering a liquor establishment after hours under this section, only violations of Title 12 can be the basis of an officer's reasonable grounds. Mickelson v. State, 886 P.2d 247,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1994).

Officer must have reasonable grounds to enter premises. —

The statute's language plainly authorizes entry after hours only when an officer has reasonable grounds to believe that evidence of a violation of “this title” is occurring inside the place to be entered. Mickelson v. State, 886 P.2d 247,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1994).

Subsection (c) of this section requires reasonable grounds as the basis for the entry—thus, logically, the officers must have reasonable grounds before they decide to enter. Post hoc rationalizations cannot justify a decision to enter without reasonable grounds. Mickelson v. State, 886 P.2d 247,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1994).

Where the police did not have reasonable grounds to demand entry to the bar pursuant to W.S. 12-2-304(c), and since the police did not have authority to demand entrance, appellant's refusal to admit them did not result in an interference with the performance of the officer's official duties. Mickelson v. State, 886 P.2d 247,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1994).

Shutting off the lights

and not immediately leaving the bar is not a violation of the liquor code. Mickelson v. State, 886 P.2d 247,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1994).

§ 12-2-305.
Sales to violators prohibited; hearing and review.

Whenever any licensee is convicted of willfully violating any provision of this title, upon satisfactory proof of the conviction, the division may, after notice and hearing, refuse to sell alcoholic beverages to the licensee. The administrative proceeding shall be conducted as a contested case before a hearing examiner of the office of administrative hearings, who shall recommend a decision to the division. Judicial review, if any, shall be from the decision of the division and in accordance with the provisions of the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

History.

Laws 1935, ch. 117, § 2; 1939, ch. 109, § 1; 1945, ch. 132, §§ 1-5; C.S. 1945, § 53-102; W.S. 1957, § 12-39 (l); W.S. 1977, §

12-3-102

; Laws 1978, ch. 51, § 1; 1996, ch. 74, § 2; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

Cross references. —

As to judicial review of administrative action, see Rule 12, W.R.A.P.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” throughout the section.

Wyoming Administrative Procedures Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Regulation and control of intoxicating liquor is aspect of police power

and is a governmental function. Harrison v. Wyoming Liquor Comm'n, 63 Wyo. 13, 177 P.2d 397,

1947 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1947).

§ 12-2-306.
Sales to licensees failing to pay sales tax prohibited; hearing and review.

Upon certification by the department of revenue that any licensee is sixty (60) or more days delinquent in paying sales taxes, the division shall not sell alcoholic beverages to the licensee or its operator until the department of revenue certifies that the licensee has paid all sales taxes owed. Upon receipt of certification, the division shall notify the issuing licensing authority of the delinquency. The licensee shall be allowed a hearing before the state board of equalization as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act if the licensee feels aggrieved by any action taken under this section.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 92, § 1; 1991, ch. 174, § 2; 1996, ch. 74, § 2; ch. 122, § 2; 2016 ch. 51, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, substituted “division” for “commission” throughout the section.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).